Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.080

Certifications existing before July 1, 2013.

(1) The department may not issue new certifications for category C, D, E, or F health care assistants on or after July 1, 2013. The department shall certify a category C, D, E, or F health care assistant whose certification is in good standing and who was certified prior to July 1, 2013, as a medical assistant-certified when he or she renews his or her certification.

(2) The department may not issue new certifications for category G health care assistants on or after July 1, 2013. The department shall certify a category G health care assistant whose certification is in good standing and who was certified prior to July 1, 2013, as a medical assistant-hemodialysis technician when he or she renews his or her certification.

(3) The department may not issue new certifications for category A or B health care assistants on or after July 1, 2013. The department shall certify a category A or B health care assistant whose certification is in good standing and who was certified prior to July 1, 2013, as a medical assistant-phlebotomist when he or she renews his or her certification.

[ 2013 c 128 s 5; 2012 c 153 s 9.]

NOTES:

Implementation—Effective date—2013 c 128: See notes following RCW 18.360.005.

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.